Missouri, session 2026, SB1509.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
five new sections, to be known as sections 217.950, 217.955,
217.960, 217.965, and 217.970, to read as follows:
217.950. As used in sections 217.955 to 217.970, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of corrections;
(2) "Family member", includes a grandparent, parent,
sibling, spouse or domestic partner, child, aunt, uncle,
cousin, niece, nephew, grandchild, or any other person
related to an individual by blood, adoption, marriage, or a
fostering relationship;
(3) "Office", the office of the state ombudsman for
inmates in the custody of the department of corrections;
(4) "Ombudsman", the state ombudsman for inmates in
the custody of the department of corrections.
217.955. 1. There is hereby established within the
department of corrections the "Office of State Ombudsman for
Inmates in the Custody of the Department of Corrections",
for the purpose of helping to assure the adequacy of care

SB 1509 2
received by inmates and to improve the quality of life
experienced by them.
2. The office shall be administered by the state
ombudsman, who shall devote his or her entire time to the
duties of his or her position.
3. The office shall establish and implement procedures
for receiving, processing, responding to, and resolving
complaints made by or on behalf of inmates in the custody of
the department of corrections relating to action, inaction,
or decisions of department staff or contractors which may
adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of
such inmates.
4. The office shall establish and implement procedures
for the resolution of complaints. The ombudsman or
representatives of the office shall have the authority to:
(1) Provide information, as appropriate, to inmates,
family members of inmates, representatives of inmates,
department of corrections employees and contractors, and
others regarding the rights of inmates;
(2) Monitor conditions of confinement and assess
department of corrections compliance with applicable
federal, state, and department rules and regulations as
related to the health, safety, welfare, and rehabilitation
of inmates;
(3) Provide technical assistance to support inmate
participation in self-advocacy;
(4) Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to
collect and analyze data related to complaints received by
the department, and data related to the following:
(a) Deaths, suicides, and suicide attempts in custody;
(b) Physical and sexual assaults in custody;

SB 1509 3
(c) Number of people placed in administrative
segregation or solitary confinement, and duration of stay in
such confinement;
(d) Number of facility lockdowns lasting longer than
twenty-four hours;
(e) Number of staff vacancies at each facility;
(f) Inmate to staff ratios at each facility;
(g) Staff tenure and turnover; and
(h) Numbers of in-person visits to inmates that were
made and denied at each facility;
(5) Inspect each department facility at least once
each year and at least two times each year for each maximum
security facility and each facility where the office has
found cause for more frequent inspection or monitoring;
(6) Publicly issue annual facility inspection reports
and an annual report with recommendations on the department
facilities and a summary of data and recommendations arising
from any complaints investigated and resolved pursuant to
section 217.965;
(7) Monitor all decisions of the parole board.
5. The office shall be directed by an ombudsman, who
shall be appointed by the governor, and shall serve a term
of six years. The ombudsman shall not be a current or
former employee or contractor of the department, and the
ombudsman's spouse or domestic partner, parents,
grandparents, children, or siblings shall not be a current
employee or contractor of the department.
6. The ombudsman shall have the authority to hire
staff, contractors, and unpaid volunteers.
7. (1) The office shall have reasonable access, upon
demand in-person or in-writing and with or without prior
notice, to all department facilities, including all areas

SB 1509 4
which are used by inmates, all areas which are accessible to
inmates, and to programs for inmates at reasonable times,
which at a minimum shall include normal working hours and
visiting hours. This authority includes the opportunity to
conduct an interview with any inmate, department employee or
contractor, or other person.
(2) The office shall have the authority to meet and
communicate privately and confidentially with individuals
regularly, both formally and informally, by telephone, mail,
electronic communication, and in-person.
(3) The office shall have the authority to access,
inspect, and copy all relevant information, records, or
documents in the possession or control of the department
that the office considers necessary in an investigation of a
complaint filed pursuant to section 217.970, and the
department shall assist the office in obtaining the
necessary releases for those documents which are
specifically restricted or privileged for use by the office
no later than thirty days after the office's written request
for such records. If the records requested by the office
pertain to an inmate death, threat of death or bodily harm,
sexual assault, or the denial of necessary medical
treatment, the records shall be provided by the department
within five days unless the office consents to an extension
of time no longer than thirty days.
8. The office shall establish confidentiality rules
and procedures for all information maintained by the office
to ensure that the identity of a complainant is not known to
department employees or contractors or other inmates. The
office may disclose identifying information for the sole
purpose of carrying out an investigation.

SB 1509 5
217.960. 1. As used in this section, "covered issues"
shall mean:
(1) Sanitation in prison facilities;
(2) Access to proper nutrition and a clean and
adequate water supply;
(3) Livable temperatures in prison facilities;
(4) Physical or sexual abuse from fellow inmates;
(5) Physical or sexual abuse from department of
corrections staff or contractors;
(6) Credible threats against an inmate from other
inmates, prison staff, or contractors;
(7) Neglect of prison staff or contractors that
results in physical or sexual trauma;
(8) Denial of rights afforded to inmates under federal
or state law;
(9) Access to visitation and communication with family
and legal representation;
(10) Any instance in which the office determines an
action or behavior to be such that it constitutes abuse or
neglect against an inmate.
2. The office shall conduct at least one inspection
each year of each department of corrections facility and at
least two times each year for each maximum security facility
to monitor the status of all covered issues pursuant to this
section. The office shall conduct an inspection of each
department facility and release a public report pursuant to
section 217.965.
3. An inspection of a department facility shall
include an assessment of all of the following:
(1) All policies and procedures in place by the
facility related to the care of inmates;
(2) Conditions of confinement;

SB 1509 6
(3) Availability of educational and rehabilitative
programming, drug and mental health treatment, and inmate
jobs and vocational training;
(4) Review of hourly wages of inmates;
(5) All policies and procedures related to visitation;
(6) All medical facilities and medical procedures and
policies;
(7) Review of lockdowns at the facility in the time
since the last inspection;
(8) Review of staffing at the facility, including the
number and job assignments of correctional staff, the ratio
of staff to inmates at the facility, and the staff position
vacancy rate at the facility;
(9) Review of physical and sexual assaults at the
facility in the time since the last inspection;
(10) Review of any inmate or staff deaths that
occurred at the facility in the time since the last
inspection;
(11) Review of the department staff recruitment,
training, supervision, and discipline; and
(12) Any other aspect of the operation of the facility
that the office deems necessary over the course of an
inspection.
217.965. 1. Upon completion of an inspection, the
office shall produce a report to be made available to the
public on the office's website, and to be delivered to the
governor, the attorney general, the president pro tempore of
the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the director of the department. The report shall include:
(1) A summary of the facility's policies and
procedures related to care of the inmates;

SB 1509 7
(2) A characterization of the conditions of
confinement;
(3) A catalogue of available educational and
rehabilitative programming, drug and mental health
treatment, and inmate jobs and vocational training;
(4) A summary of visitation policies and procedures;
(5) A summary of medical facilities and medical
procedures and policies;
(6) A summary of the lockdowns review by the office;
(7) A summary of the staffing at the facility,
including policies relating to staff recruitment, training,
supervision, and discipline;
(8) A summary of physical and sexual assaults reviewed
by the office;
(9) A summary of any inmate or staff deaths that
occurred at the facility; and
(10) Recommendations made to the facility to improve
safety and conditions within the facility.
2. The department shall submit a report to the office
within thirty days of the office's inspection report which
shall include a corrective action plan for each
recommendation of the office.
217.970. 1. The office may initiate and attempt to
resolve an investigation upon its own initiative, or upon
receipt of a complaint from an inmate, family member,
representative of an inmate, a department employee or
contractor, or others, regarding any of the following that
may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights
of inmates:
(1) Abuse or neglect;
(2) Conditions of confinement;
(3) Department decisions or administrative actions;

SB 1509 8
(4) Department inactions or omissions;
(5) Department policies, rules, or procedures;
(6) Alleged violations of law by department employees
or contractors that may adversely affect the health, safety,
welfare, and rights of inmates; or
(7) Decisions of the parole board.
2. The office shall decline to investigate a complaint
if the inmate has failed to first utilize the department
policies and procedures regarding resolution of inmate
grievances. If the office does not investigate a complaint,
the office shall notify the complainant in writing of the
decision not to investigate and the reasons for the decision.
3. Any action or lack of action on a complaint by the
office shall not be deemed an administrative procedure
required for exhaustion of remedies prior to bringing an
action pursuant to the Prison Litigation Reform Act, 42
U.S.C. Section 1997e, et seq.
4. The office may not investigate any complaints
relating to an inmate's underlying criminal conviction.
5. The office may not investigate a complaint from a
department employee or contractor that relates to the
employee or contractor's employment relationship with the
department unless the complaint is related to the health,
safety, welfare, and rehabilitation of inmates.
6. The office may refer the complainant and others to
appropriate resources or state, tribal, or federal agencies.
7. The office may not levy any fees for the submission
or investigation of complaints.
8. The office may investigate any complaint regarding
a parole decision.
9. At the conclusion of an investigation of a
complaint, the office shall render a public decision on the

SB 1509 9
merits of each complaint within ninety days of the filing of
the complaint, except that the documents supporting the
decision are subject to the confidentiality provision of
section 217.955. The office shall give a decision in
writing to the inmate, if any, and to the department. The
office shall state its recommendations and reasoning if, in
the office's opinion, the department or any employee or
contractor thereof should:
(1) Consider the matter further;
(2) Modify or cancel any action;
(3) Alter a rule, practice, or ruling;
(4) Explain in detail the administrative action in
question; or
(5) Rectify an omission.
10. If the office so requests, the department shall,
within thirty days, inform the office in writing about any
action taken on the recommendations or the reasons for not
complying with the recommendations.
11. If the office finds, based on the investigation,
that there has been or continues to be a significant inmate
health, safety, welfare, or rehabilitation issue, the office
shall report such finding to the governor, the attorney
general, the president pro tempore of the senate, speaker of
the house of representatives, and the director of the
department of corrections.
12. In the event that the department conducts an
internal disciplinary investigation and review of one or
more of its staff members as a result of an office
investigation, the department's disciplinary review may be
subject to additional review and investigation by the office
to ensure a fair and objective process.

SB 1509 10
13. The department and its employees and contractors
shall not discharge, retaliate against, or in any manner
discriminate against any person because such person has
filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted
any investigation under section 217.970.
(1) Any alleged discharge of, retaliation against, or
discrimination against a complainant may be considered by
the office as an appropriate subject of an investigation.
(2) Any department employee or contractor who believes
that he or she has been discharged or otherwise retaliated
against by any person in violation of this chapter may,
within thirty days after such violation occurs, file a
complaint with the attorney general.
(3) If the complainant has suffered abuse or any other
violation of this chapter after he or she filed a complaint,
there shall be a rebuttable presumption of retaliation.
✓